Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.110

Decree does not affect tenant.

Such decree and partition shall not affect any tenants for years or for life, of the whole of the property which is the subject of partition, nor shall such decree and partition preclude any persons, except such as are specified in RCW 7.52.100, from claiming title to the property in question, or from controverting the title of the parties between whom the partition shall have been made.

[Code 1881 s 562; 1877 p 119 s 567; 1869 p 135 s 515; RRS s 848.]